Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-560
Class IV school district; board of education; meetings; open to public.

The board of education of a Class IV school district shall hold one or more regular meetings each month, the time of which shall be fixed by the bylaws adopted by such board. Special meetings may be held as circumstances may demand. All meetings of the board shall be subject to the Open Meetings Act.

Laws 1917, c. 225, § 6, p. 551;

Laws 1921, c. 60, § 1, p. 243;

C.S.1922, § 6615;

C.S.1929, § 79-2606;

R.S.1943, § 79-2606;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 210, p. 760;

R.R.S.1943, § 79-523;

Laws 1971, LB 450, § 2;

Laws 1972, LB 1268, § 3;

Laws 1990, LB 1109, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-906;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 313;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 26.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.